Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB554.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Official and Public Employee Expense Reimbursement Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Governmental body." A department, agency, authority, commission, committee, council, board, bureau, division, service, office, officer, administration, legislative body or other establishment in the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the Commonwealth."Itemized receipt." A written acknowledgment from the vendor attesting to the receipt of cash, check, money order, credit 123456789101112131415161718 card or other method of payment, in exchange for goods or services, with the cost and description of each item or article stated separately."Public employee." An individual employed by the Commonwealth."Public official." A person elected by the public or elected or appointed by a governmental body or an appointed official in the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Receipts and limitations.A public official or public employee may not be reimbursed for a travel expense unless the public official or public employee submits an itemized receipt. Reimbursement is subject to Federal per diem rate limits published by the Internal Revenue Service.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0554PN0548 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617